Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.180

Designation of district treasurer.

(1) The county treasurer of the county within which all, or the major portion, of the district lies must be the ex officio treasurer of a metropolitan park district, but may receive no compensation other than his or her regular salary for receiving and disbursing the funds of a metropolitan park district.

(2) A metropolitan park district may designate someone other than the county treasurer who has experience in financial or fiscal affairs to act as the district treasurer if the board has received the approval of the county treasurer to designate this person; or if the district boundaries are coterminous with the boundaries of a city, the city may act as the district treasurer. If the board designates someone other than a county or city treasurer to act as the district treasurer, the board must purchase a bond from a surety company operating in the state that is sufficient to protect the district from loss.

[ 2017 c 215 s 7; 1987 c 203 s 1; 1983 c 167 s 55; 1965 c 7 s 35.61.180. Prior: 1943 c 264 s 13; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6741-13; prior: 1907 c 98 s 13; RRS s 6732.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.